src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv16_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: mús
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: mús
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: mús
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: músar
    mús+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: mýs
    mús+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: músum
    mús+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: músa
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: músin
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: músina
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: músini
    mús+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: músarinnar
    mús+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: mýsnar
    mús+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [músunum, mýsnum]
    mús+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: músanna
